Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-369
Street improvement districts; delineate; purpose.

To accomplish any of the purposes stated in section 23-368, the county is authorized in all such proceedings to delineate proposed street improvement districts which shall embrace therein the street or streets or part or parts thereof to be improved as well as the abutting, adjacent, and benefited property proposed to be assessed to cover in whole or in part the cost, including land acquisition expenses if any, of the proposed improvement outside of the corporate limits of any city or village.

Laws 1961, c. 93, § 2, p. 320.